North Dakota, session 69, HB1350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 62.1-01-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. "Dangerous weapon" includes any switchblade or gravity knife, machete, scimitar,
stiletto, sword, dagger, or knife with a blade of five inches [12.7 centimeters] or more;
any throwing star, nunchaku, or other martial arts weapon; any billy, blackjack, sap,
bludgeon, cudgel, metal knuckles, or sand club; any slungshot; any bow and arrow,
crossbow, or spear; any weapon that will expel, or is readily capable of expelling, a
projectile by the action of a spring, compressed air, or compressed gas, including any
such weapon, loaded or unloaded, commonly referred to as a BB gun, air rifle, or CO2
gun; and any projector of a bomb or any object containing or capable of producing and
emitting any noxious liquid, gas, or substance. "Dangerous weapon" does not include
an item used for the purpose of carrying out a business, trade, or profession; a spray
or aerosol containing CS, also known as ortho-chlorobenzamalonitrile; CN, also known
as alpha-chloroacetophenone; or other irritating agent intended for use in the defense
of an individual, nor does the term include a device that uses voltage for the defense
of an individual, unless the device uses a projectile and voltage or the device uses a
projectile and may be used to apply multiple applications of voltage during a single
incident, then the term includes the device for an individual who is prohibited from
possessing a firearm under this title.
Page No. 1 25.0939.01000